District of Columbia statutes.
5-561.01

Conversion to new salary schedule, 1997.

Repealed.

Oct. 10, 1997, 111 Stat. 1285, Pub. L. 105-61, § 118(b)
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(3)
Savings Provision: Section 118(d) of Pub. L. 106-61, 111 Stat. 1285, provided that on the effective date of § 118, any existing special salary rates authorized for members of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division under § 5305 of title 5, United States Code (or any previous similar provision of law) and any special rates of pay or special pay adjustments under section 403, 404, or 405 of the Federal Law Enforcement Pay Reform Act of 1990 applicable to members of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division shall be rendered inapplicable.
Section 118(f) of Pub. L. 105-61, 111 Stat. 1285, provided that the provisions of § 118 shall become effective on the first day of the first pay period beginning after the Dates of enactment of the act. Public Law 105-61 was approved on October 10, 1997.
1981 Ed., § 4-416.1.